public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.old.verb.rules.aff
# vèrbi -àr, -ér, -<is>ír, -ír, -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2P0P1P2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2d0d1d2P0P1P2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2P0P1P2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2f0f1f2P0P1P2
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0
# themeT8 + oe/a0a1a2I1
SFX a0 Y 405
SFX a0 0 ane/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 atu/I3 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 emo/P0I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 ene/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 esene/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 esiu/I5 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 imo/P0I0 er	
SFX a0 0 ione/I1 [^cijɉñ][aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 ionme/P6 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 isen/I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 isene/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 isense [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 isensi [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 ision/I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 isione/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 isionse [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 isié/I4 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 isiéu/I5 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 ison/I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 isone/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 isonse [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 iéu/I5 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 iónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 me/P6 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 on/P0I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 onme/P6 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 à/P3I0I2 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 àe/P3 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 è/I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 ène/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 émoe/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 ésimoe/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 ésitu/I3 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 éu/I5 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 í/I4 er	
SFX a0 0 ía/I0I2 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 èe/P3I0I2 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 íane/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 íatu/I3 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 íe/P3I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 íene/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 ímoe/I1 er	 
SFX a0 0 íu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 0 ò/I0 [aei]r	
SFX a0 0 òe/I1 [aei]r	 
SFX a0 0 ónmene/P6 [aei]r
SFX a0 ar ede/I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar ege/I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar emo/P0I0 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erane/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar eratu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erave/P3 ar	
SFX a0 ar eremo/P0I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar eren/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erense ar	
SFX a0 ar erensi ar	
SFX a0 ar eresi/I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar eresiu/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erion/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erione/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erionse ar	
SFX a0 ar erisen/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erisene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erisense ar	
SFX a0 ar erisensi ar	
SFX a0 ar erisi/I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar erision/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erisione/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erisionse ar	
SFX a0 ar erisiu/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erisié/I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar erisiéu/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erison/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erisone/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erisonse ar	
SFX a0 ar erié/I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar eriéu/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar eron/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erone/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar eronse ar	
SFX a0 ar erà/P3I0I2 ar	
SFX a0 ar eràe/P3 ar	
SFX a0 ar eràvene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erè/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erène/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar eré/I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar erémoe/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erémome/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar erémomene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar erésimo/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar erésimoe/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erésitu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar eréu/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar ería/I0I2 ar	
SFX a0 ar erèe/P3I0I2 ar	
SFX a0 ar eríane/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar eríatu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar eríe/P3I0I2 ar	
SFX a0 ar eríene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erísitu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar erò/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar eròe/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar ionme/P6 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a0 ar ivene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar ivione/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar iviéu/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar ivone/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar iéu/I5 [^cijɉñ]ar	 
SFX a0 ar iónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a0 ar onme/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar à/P0M0 ar	
SFX a0 ar àa/F0P3I0I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar àane/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àau/I5 ar	
SFX a0 ar àe/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar àene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar ài/I0I2I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar àimo/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar àimoe/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àitu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àmene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar àndome/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar àndomene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar àntome/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar àntomene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar ào/I0M0 ar	
SFX a0 ar àone/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àrmene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar àsimo ar	
SFX a0 ar àsitu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àvane/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àvau/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àvene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àvimoe/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àvitu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar àvone/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar è/P3I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar ème/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar èmene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar èu/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar éa/P3I0I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar éane/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar éau/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar ée/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar éene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar éi/I0I2I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar éimo/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar éimoe/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar éitu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar émoe/I1 ar	  
SFX a0 ar émome/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar émomene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar éndome/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar éndomene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar éntome/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar éntomene/P6 ar
SFX a0 ar éo/I0 ar	
SFX a0 ar éone/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar ésimo ar	
SFX a0 ar éu/I5 ar	  
SFX a0 ar évane/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar évau/I5 ar	 
SFX a0 ar évene/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar évimoe/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar évitu/I3 ar	 
SFX a0 ar évone/I1 ar	 
SFX a0 ar í/P3I4 ar	
SFX a0 ar ónmene/P6 ar
SFX a0 e me/P6 oe
SFX a0 e mene/P6 oe
SFX a0 e ne/I1M0 oe	 
SFX a0 e nte/M0mf oe	 
SFX a0 e nto oe	 
SFX a0 e te/M0 oe	 
SFX a0 e u/I5 oe	 
SFX a0 er arane/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er aratu/I3 er	 
SFX a0 er arave/P3 er	
SFX a0 er aremo/P0I0 er	
SFX a0 er aren/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arene/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arense er	
SFX a0 er arensi er	
SFX a0 er aresi/I4 er	
SFX a0 er aresiu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er arimo/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arion/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arione/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arionse er	
SFX a0 er arisen/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arisene/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arisense er	
SFX a0 er arisensi er	
SFX a0 er arisi/I4 er	
SFX a0 er arision/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arisione/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arisionse er	
SFX a0 er arisiu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er arisié/I4 er	
SFX a0 er arisiéu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er arison/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arisone/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arisonse er	
SFX a0 er arié/I4 er	
SFX a0 er ariéu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er aron/P0I0 er	
SFX a0 er aronme/P6 er
SFX a0 er arà/P3I0I2 er	
SFX a0 er aràe/P3 er	
SFX a0 er aràvene/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arè/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arène/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er aré/I4 er	
SFX a0 er arémoe/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arémome/P6 er
SFX a0 er arémomene/P6 er
SFX a0 er arésimo/I0 er	
SFX a0 er arésimoe/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arésitu/I3 er	 
SFX a0 er aréu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er arí/I4 er	
SFX a0 er aría/I0I2 er	
SFX a0 er arèe/P3I0I2 er	
SFX a0 er aríane/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er aríatu/I3 er	 
SFX a0 er aríe/P3I0I2 er	
SFX a0 er aríene/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arímoe/I1 er	
SFX a0 er arísitu/I3 er	 
SFX a0 er aríu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er arò/I0 er	
SFX a0 er aròe/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er arónmene/P6 er
SFX a0 er ime/P6 er
SFX a0 er imo/P0I0 er	
SFX a0 er ionme/P6 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a0 er ivene/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er ivione/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er iviéu/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er ivone/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er iéu/I5 [^cijɉñ]er	 
SFX a0 er iónmene/P6 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a0 er onme/P6 er
SFX a0 er àndome/P6 er
SFX a0 er àndomene/P6 er
SFX a0 er àntome/P6 er
SFX a0 er àntomene/P6 er
SFX a0 er éa/P3I0I4 er	
SFX a0 er éane/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er éau/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er ée/I0 er	
SFX a0 er éene/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er éi/I0I2I4 er	
SFX a0 er éimo/I0 er	
SFX a0 er éimoe/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er éitu/I3 er	 
SFX a0 er émene/P6 er
SFX a0 er émoe/I1 er	  
SFX a0 er émome/P6 er
SFX a0 er émomene/P6 er
SFX a0 er éndome/P6 er
SFX a0 er éndomene/P6 er
SFX a0 er éntome/P6 er
SFX a0 er éntomene/P6 er
SFX a0 er éo/I0 er	
SFX a0 er éone/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er érmene/P6 er
SFX a0 er ésimo er	
SFX a0 er éu/I5 er	  
SFX a0 er évane/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er évau/I5 er	 
SFX a0 er évene/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er évimoe/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er évitu/I3 er	 
SFX a0 er évone/I1 er	 
SFX a0 er í/P3I4 er	 
SFX a0 er ímene/P6 er
SFX a0 er ímoe/I1 er
SFX a0 er íu/I5 er	  
SFX a0 er ónmene/P6 er
SFX a0 io i/P0P3I2 io	 
SFX a0 ir ímene/P6 ir
SFX a0 ir írmene/P6 ir
SFX a0 o a/P0P3 o	
SFX a0 o e/P0P3I0 o	 
SFX a0 o i/P0P3I2 [^i]o	 
SFX a0 oe ae/M0 oe	  
SFX a0 oe ame/P6 oe
SFX a0 oe amene/P6 oe
SFX a0 oe ane/I1 oe	 
SFX a0 oe ee/M0 oe	  
SFX a0 oe eme/P6 oe
SFX a0 oe emene/P6 oe
SFX a0 oe ene/I1 oe	 
SFX a0 oe ime/P6 oe
SFX a0 oe imene/P6 oe
SFX a0 oe ine/I1 oe	  
SFX a0 oe itu/I3 oe	  
SFX a0 r de er	
SFX a0 r ge er	
SFX a0 r mo/I0 er	 
SFX a0 r n/I0 er	 
SFX a0 r ne/I1 er	  
SFX a0 r nse er	 
SFX a0 r nsi er	 

SFX a1 Y 135
SFX a1 0 alo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 ave-lo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 emo/P1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 imo/P1 er
SFX a1 0 ionme/P7 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a1 0 iónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a1 0 me/P7 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 on/P1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 à-lo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 àe-lo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 àelo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 àvelo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 íe-lo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 íelo/A1 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 íselo/I8 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 onme/P7 [aei]r
SFX a1 0 ónmelo/P7 [aei]r
SFX a1 ar e-lo/A1 [^i]ar
SFX a1 ar elo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar emo/P1 ar
SFX a1 ar ent ar	
SFX a1 ar eralo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar erave-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar eremo/P1 ar
SFX a1 ar erà-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar eràe-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar eràelo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar eràvelo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar erémolo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar erémomelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar eríe-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar eríelo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar eríselo/I8 ar
SFX a1 ar es ar	
SFX a1 ar est ar	
SFX a1 ar eve-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar iónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a1 ar à/P1 ar
SFX a1 ar àe-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar àelo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar àmelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar àndolo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar àndomelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar àntolo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar àntomelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar àrmelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar è-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar èlo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar èmelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar é-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar ée-lo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar éelo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar émolo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar émomelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar éndolo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar éndomelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar éntolo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar éntomelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar évelo/A1 ar
SFX a1 ar ionme/P7 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a1 ar onme/P7 ar
SFX a1 ar ónmelo/P7 ar
SFX a1 e lo/P7 oe
SFX a1 e melo/P7 oe
SFX a1 e nte/M0FSmf oe	 
SFX a1 er aralo/A1 er
SFX a1 er arave-lo/A1 er
SFX a1 er aremo/P1 er
SFX a1 er aron/P1 er
SFX a1 er arà-lo/A1 er
SFX a1 er aràe-lo/A1 er
SFX a1 er aràelo/A1 er
SFX a1 er aràvelo/A1 er
SFX a1 er arémolo/P7 er
SFX a1 er arémomelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er aríe-lo/A1 er
SFX a1 er aríelo/A1 er
SFX a1 er aríselo/I8 er
SFX a1 er aronme/P7 er
SFX a1 er arónmelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er ilo/P7 er
SFX a1 er imo/P1 er
SFX a1 er ionme/P7 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a1 er iónmelo/P7 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a1 er àndolo/P7 er
SFX a1 er àndomelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er àntolo/P7 er
SFX a1 er àntomelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er é-lo/A1 er
SFX a1 er émelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er émolo/P7 er
SFX a1 er émomelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er éndolo/P7 er
SFX a1 er éndomelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er éntolo/P7 er
SFX a1 er éntomelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er érmelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er évelo/A1 er
SFX a1 er ímelo/P7 er
SFX a1 er onme/P7 er
SFX a1 er ónmelo/P7 er
SFX a1 iar e-lo/A1 iar
SFX a1 ier e-lo/A1 ier
SFX a1 io i/P1 io
SFX a1 ioe elo/A1 ioe
SFX a1 ir e-lo/A1 ir
SFX a1 ir ímelo/P7 ir
SFX a1 ir írmelo/P7 ir
SFX a1 ir ívelo/A1 ir
SFX a1 o a/P1 o
SFX a1 o e/P1 o
SFX a1 o i/P1 [^i]o
SFX a1 oe alo/P7 oe
SFX a1 oe amelo/P7 oe
SFX a1 oe elo/P7 oe
SFX a1 oe emelo/P7 oe
SFX a1 oe ilo/P7 oe
SFX a1 oe imelo/P7 oe
SFX a1 r t ar	
SFX a1 r nt ar	
SFX a1 r nt er	
SFX a1 r -lo/A1 [^i]er
SFX a1 r lo/A1 er
SFX a1 r s [ae]r	
SFX a1 r st [aei]r	
SFX a1 r ve-lo/A1 [aei]r
